Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-824
Violations; proceedings; evidence; discovery; privilege not allowed.

In all prosecutions, hearings, and proceedings under sections 59-801 to 59-831, whether civil or criminal, no person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents before the courts of this state, or in obedience to the subpoena of the same, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of such person, may tend to criminate such person or subject such person to a penalty or forfeiture.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 21, p. 644;

R.S.1913, § 4065;

C.S.1922, § 3468;

C.S.1929, § 59-821;

R.S.1943, § 59-824;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 14.